trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="ske__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/inde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inde</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indes</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inder</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indes</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andt</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andtes</l>    <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>undet</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indende</l>   <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skr/ige__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ige</l>       <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iger</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iges</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eg</l>        <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eget</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igende</l>    <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skil/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lende</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ige__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ige</l>       <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iger</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iges</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igende</l>    <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/øre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øre</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorde</l>     <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>  <!-- gjordes rent -->
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørende</l>    <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="v/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idste</l>     <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idst</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ægge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æg</l>        <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægge</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægger</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægges</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æggende</l>   <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/idde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idder</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddes</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddet</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddende</l>   <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ade__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ader</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adet</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adende</l>    <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="syn/es__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esnde</l>     <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="finde">           <i>f</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finde på">        <i>f</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/><p><l><b/>på</l><r><g><b/>på</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="forsvinde">       <i>forsv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ske">             <i>ske</i><par n="ske__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skille">          <i>skil</i><par n="skil/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skrige">          <i>skr</i><par n="skr/ige__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svinde">          <i>sv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vinde">           <i>v</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslaglægge">     <i>beslagl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forudsige">       <i>foruds</i><par n="s/ige__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gøre">            <i>g</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gøre rent">       <i>g</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>rent</l><r><g><b/>rent</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lægge">           <i>l</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lade">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ade__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="længes">          <i>læng</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="løsnes">          <i>løsn</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="planlægge">       <i>planl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sige">            <i>s</i><par n="s/ige__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sidde">           <i>s</i><par n="s/idde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skændes">         <i>skænd</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="synes">           <i>syn</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udgøre">          <i>udg</i><par n="g/øre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vide">            <i>v</i><par n="v/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ødelægge">        <i>ødel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
